en: Red grapefruit pulps, Red grapefruit pulp
fr: Pulpe de pomelo rose, Pulpe de pamplemousse rose

en: Figs
bg: Смокини
de: Feigen
es: Higos
fi: Viikunat
fr: Figues
hr: Smokve
ja: イチジク, いちじく, 無花果
la: Ficus carica
lt: Figos
nl: Vijgen

en: Fresh figs
fr: Figues fraîches
hr: Svježe smokve
lt: Šviežios figos

en: Grapes
af: Druiwe
am: ወይን
an: Uga
ar: عنب
as: আঙুৰ
az: Üzüm
ba: Йөҙөм
be: Вінаградзіна
bg: Грозде
bn: আঙ্গুর
bo: རྒུནའབྲུམ།
br: Rezin
bs: Grožđe
ca: Raïm
cs: Bobule
cy: Grawnwin
da: Vindruer
de: Weintrauben
dv: މޭބިސްކަދުރު
el: Σταφύλι
eo: Vinberoj
es: Uvas
et: Viinamari
eu: Mahats
fa: انگور
fi: Viinirypäleet
fj: Qerepi
fr: Raisins, Raisin
ga: Fíonchaor
gl: Uva
gn: Úva
gu: દ્રાક્ષ
gv: Smeyr-feeyney
hi: अंगूर
hr: Grožđe
ht: Rezen
hu: Szőlő
hy: Խաղող
ia: Uva
id: Anggur
io: Vito
is: Vínber
it: Uva
ja: ブドウ, ぶどう, 葡萄
jv: Anggur
ka: Ყურძენი
kk: Жүзім
km: ទំពាំងបាយជូរ
kn: ದ್ರಾಕ್ಷಿ
ko: 포도
ks: دَچھ
ku: Tirî
kw: Grappa
ky: Жүзүм
la: Uva
lb: Drauf
ln: Víno
lt: Vynuogės
lv: Vīnogas
mg: Voaloboka
mk: Грозје
ml: മുന്തിരിങ്ങ
mn: Усан үзэм
mr: द्राक्ष
ms: Anggur
my: စပျစ်ပင်
nb: Vindruer, Druer
ne: अङ्गूर
nl: Druiven, Druif
nn: Vindruer, Druer
nv: Chʼil naʼatłʼoʼii
oc: Rasim
om: Eeynaba
or: ଅଙ୍ଗୁର
pa: ਅੰਗੂਰ
pl: Winogrona, Winogrono
ps: انګور
pt: Uva
qu: Uwas
ro: Strugure
ru: Виноград
rw: Akamaro k'imizabibu
sa: द्राक्षा
sc: Bide
sd: انگور
sh: Grožđe
sk: Hrozno
sl: Grozdje
sm: Grapes
so: Canab
sq: Rrushi
sr: Грожђе
su: Anggur
sv: Vindruvor, Druvor
sw: Zabibu
ta: திராட்சை
te: ద్రాక్ష
tg: Ангур
th: องุ่น
tl: Ubas
tr: Üzüm
tt: Йөзем
ug: قۇرۇق ئۈزۈم
uk: Виноград
ur: انگور
uz: Uzum
vi: Nho
wa: Roejhén
yi: וויינטרויבן
za: Makit
zh: 葡萄
zu: UMhleke

en: Green grapes, White grapes
ar: عنب أخضر
da: Grønne vindruer
de: Weiße Weintrauben, Grüne Weintrauben, Gelbe Weintrauben
es: Uvas blancas
fr: Raisins blancs, Raisins verts
gl: Uva branca
hr: Zeleno grožđe
lt: Žalios vynuogės, Baltos vynuogės
nb: Grønne vindruer
nl: Witte druiven
nn: Grøna vindruer
ru: Белый виноград, зелёный виноград, зеленый виноград
sv: Gröna vindruvor

en: Fresh grapes
da: Friske vindruer
de: Frische Trauben, Frische Weintrauben
es: Uvas frescas
fr: Raisins frais, Raisin frais
hr: Svježe grožđe
lt: Šviežios vynuogės
sv: Färska vindruvor

en: Grape mixes, Mixed grapes
sv: Vindruvsmixar, Vindruvsmixer

en: Fresh grape mixes, Mixed fresh grapes, Fresh mixed grapes
sv: Färska vindruvsmixar

en: Black grapes, Red grapes
ar: عنب أحمر
da: Røde vindruer
de: Rote Weintrauben, Rote Trauben
es: Uvas negras
fr: Raisins noirs
hr: Crno grožđe
lt: JUodos vynuogės, Raudonos vynuogės
nl: Rode druiven
sv: Röta vindruvor

en: Fresh green grapes
da: Friske grønne vindruer
de: Frische weiße Weintrauben
es: Uvas blancas frescas
fr: Raisins blancs frais
hr: Svježe zeleno grožđe
lt: Šviežios žalios vynuogės
sv: Färska gröna vindruvor

en: Fresh red grapes, Fresh black grapes
da: Friske røde vindruer
de: Frische rote Weintrauben
es: Uvas negras frescas
fr: Raisins noirs frais
hr: Svježe crno grožđe
lt: Šviežios juodos vynuogės
sv: Färska röda vindruvor

en: Seedless grapes
da: Stenfri vindruer
de: Kernlose Weintrauben
es: Uvas sin semillas
fi: Siemenetön viinirypäle
fr: Raisins sans pépins
hr: Grožđe bez sjemenki
it: Uva senza semi
lt: Vynuogės be kauliukų
nl: Pitloze druiven
ru: Бессемянный виноград
sv: Kärnfria vindruvor
tr: Çekirdeksiz üzüm

en: Green seedless grapes, White seedless grapes
da: Stenfri grønne vindruer
de: Weiße kernlose Weintrauben, Grüne kernlose Weintrauben, Gelbe kernlose Weintrauben
es: Uvas blancas sin semillas
fr: Raisins blancs sans pépins, raisins verts sans pépins
hr: Zeleno grožđe bez sjemenki
lt: Žalios vynuogės be kauliukų, Baltos vynuogės be kauliukų
nl: Groene pitloze druiven
sv: Kärnfria gröna vindruvor

en: Black seedless grapes, Seedless red grapes, Red seedless grapes
da: Stenfri røde vindruer
de: Rote kernlose Weintrauben
es: Uvas negras sin semillas
fr: Raisins noirs épépinés
hr: Crno grožđe bez sjemenki
lt: Juodos vynuogės be kauliukų
nl: Rode pitloze druiven
sv: Kärnfria röda vindruvor

en: Fresh seedless green grapes
da: Friske stenfri grønne vindruer
de: Frische kernlose weiße Weintrauben
es: Uvas blancas sin semillas frescas
fr: Raisins blancs sans pépins frais
hr: Svježe zeleno grožđe bez sjemenki
lt: Šviežios žalios vynuogės be kauliukų
sv: Färska kärnfria gröna vindruvor

en: Fresh red seedless grapes, Fresh seedless black grapes
da: Friske stenfri røde vindruer
de: Frische kernlose rote Weintrauben
es: Uvas negras sin semillas frescas
fr: Raisins noirs sans pépins frais
hr: Svježe crno grožđe bez sjemenki
lt: Šviežios juodos vynuogės be kauliukų
sv: Färska kärnfria röda vindruvor

en: Starlight grapes, Red seedless grapes (Starlight)
da: Starlight-vindruer
sv: Starlight-vindruvor

en: Fresh Starlight grapes
da: Friske starlight-vindruer
sv: Färska starlight-vindruvor

en: Thompson Seedless grapes
da: Thompson Seedless-vindruer
sv: Thompson Seedless-vindruvor

en: Fresh Thompson Seedless grapes
da: Friske Thompson seedless-vindruer
sv: Färska Thompson seedless-vindruvor